src/morphology/incoming/rules-epsilon-verb-root-asp.script
#exceptions of aspectual verbal suffixes


#define itehrHab {'s} -> {as} || rootBM {itehr} habMarker _ ;
#define itehrPunct {'} -> {e'} || rootBM {itehr} punctMarker _ ; 
#define itehrPerf {'on} -> {on} || rootBM {itehr} perfMarker _ ; 

#-itehr 
define itehrHab {'s} -> {as} || rootBM {itehr} habMarker _ ,,
    {itehr} -> {itenr} || rootBM _ [ habMarker];
    
define itehrPunct {'} -> {e'} || rootBM {itehr} punctMarker _ ,,
    {itehr} -> {itenhr} || rootBM _ punctMarker; 
    
    
define itehrPerf {'on} -> {on} || rootBM {itehr} perfMarker _ ,,
     {itehr} -> {itenr} || rootBM _ [perfMarker]; 

define itehrAsp itehrHab .o. itehrPunct .o. itehrPerf;


#-rohrok
define rohrokHab {'s} -> {s} || rootBM {rohrok} habMarker _ ,,
    {rohrok} -> {rorok} || rootBM _ [ habMarker];

define rohrokPerf {'on} -> {on} || rootBM {rohrok} perfMarker _ ,,
     {rohrok} -> {ror} || rootBM _ [perfMarker]; 
    
define rohrokPunct {'} -> {e'} || rootBM {rohrok} punctMarker _ ,,
    {rohrok} -> {rorok} || rootBM _  punctMarker;

define rohrokAsp rohrokHab .o. rohrokPunct .o. rohrokPerf;


define aspAll itehrAsp .o. rohrokAsp;
push aspAll
